Utah statutes.
59-7-505.   Returns required -- When due -- Extension of time -- Exemption
from filing.
(1)  Each corporation subject to taxation under this chapter shall make a
return, except that a group of corporations filing a combined report under
Part 4 of this chapter shall file one combined report.
(a)  The return shall be signed by a responsible officer of the corporation,
the signature of whom need not be notarized but when signed shall be
considered as made under oath.
(b) (i)  In cases where receivers, trustees in bankruptcy, or assignees are
operating the property or business of corporations, those receivers, trustees,
or assignees shall make returns for such corporations in the same manner and
form as corporations are required to make returns.
(ii)  Any tax due on the basis of such returns made by receivers, trustees, or
assignees shall be collected in the same manner as if collected from the
corporations of whose business or property they have custody and control.
(2)  Returns shall be made on or before the 15th day of the fourth month
following the close of the taxable year.
(3) (a)  The commission shall allow a taxpayer an extension of time for filing
returns.
(b)  The extension under Subsection (3)(a) may not exceed six months.
(4)  Each return shall be made to the commission.
(5)  A corporation incorporated or qualified to do business in this state
prior to January 1, 1973, is not liable for filing a return or paying tax
measured by income for the taxable year in which it legally terminates its
existence.
(6)  A corporation incorporated or qualified to do business or which had its
authority to do business reinstated on or after January 1, 1973, shall file a
return and pay the tax measured by income for each period during which it had
the right to do business in this state, and the return shall be filed and the
tax paid within three months and 15 days after the close of this period.
(7)  If a corporation terminates its existence under Section 16-10a-1401, no
returns are required to be filed if a statement is furnished to the commission
that no business has been conducted during that period.
(8) (a)  A corporation commencing to do business in Utah after qualification
or incorporation with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code is not
required to file a return for the period commencing with the date of
incorporation or qualification and ending on the last day of the same month,
if that corporation was not doing business in and received no income from
sources in the state during such period.
(b)  In determining whether a corporation comes within the provisions of this
chapter, affidavits on behalf of the corporation that it did no business in
and received no income from sources in Utah during such period shall be filed
with the commission.
